District of Columbia statutes.
9-204.05

Use of living persons’ names prohibited; use of deceased persons’ names restricted.

No public space in the District shall be named in honor of any living person, or in honor of any person who has been deceased less than 2 years, unless the deceased person was a President or Vice President of the United States, a United States Senator or Representative, a Mayor of the District of Columbia, or a member of the Council of the District of Columbia.

History

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 405, 30 DCR 148

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-455.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) acceptance of dedication, see § 2 of Dedication and Designation of Harry Thomas Way Temporary Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-251, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4164).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary designation of minor street as “Harry Thomas Way”, see § 2(b) of the Dedication and Designation of Harry Thomas Way Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-579, January 12, 1999, 45 DCR 966).
For designation of certain dedicated land, see § 2(b) of the Dedication and Designation of Harry Thomas Way, N.E. Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-198, December 1, 1999, 46 DCR 10444).
For designation of certain dedicated land, see § 2(b) of the Dedication and Designation of Harry Thomas Way, N.E. Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-277, March 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2017).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the Athletic Field Naming and Sponsorship Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-201, Nov. 23, 2015, 62 DCR 15274).